Illinois, session 104th, SB3644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rooftop Safety for First Responders Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 180/15)7    Sec. 15. Survey. 8    (a) No later than January 1, 2027, and every 2 years 9thereafter, each municipality with a population of 500,000 or 10more inhabitants shall complete a survey of buildings in its 11jurisdiction that have skylights and other openings located in 12the plane of a low-sloped roof.13    (a-5) No later than January 1, 2027, and every 2 years 14thereafter, each municipality with a population of fewer than 15500,000 inhabitants shall complete a survey of new buildings 16in its jurisdiction that have skylights and other openings 17located in the plane of a low-sloped roof. 18    (a-10) Within one year after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each 20municipality with a population of fewer than 500,000 21inhabitants shall develop a methodology to collect data 22regarding the presence of skylights and other openings in the 23plane of low-sloped roofs of existing buildings by examining   SB3644 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18828 TRT 32273 b1building permits for new renovation projects or collecting 2information during required inspections of existing buildings. 3    (b) The results of the survey shall be reported in a 4building inventory that shall be shared with local police 5departments and local fire departments.6    (c) In counties with a population greater than 1,000,000, 7the results of the survey shall be shared with local police 8departments and local fire departments and shall be stored in 9all computer-aided dispatch systems.10(Source: P.A. 104-121, eff. 1-1-26.)